Arkansas, session 2025, HB1726.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 4, Chapter 88, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 15 — Arkansas Kids Online Safety Act

4-88-1501. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Arkansas Kids
Online Safety Act".

4-88-1502. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Child" means an individual who is twelve (12) years of age
or less;
(2) "Compulsive usage" means any response stimulated by external
factors that causes an individual to engage in repetitive behavior that is
reasonably likely to cause loss of control, anxiety, or depression;
(3) "Connected device” means an electronic device that:
(A) Is capable of connecting to the internet, either
directly or indirectly through a network, to communicate information at the
*LJH197*
03-13-2025 09:54:56 LJH197

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 HB1726
direction of an individual;
(B) Has computer processing capabilities for collecting,
sending, receiving, or analyzing data; and
(C) Is primarily designed for or marketed to consumers;
(4)(A) "Covered platform" means an entity that operates an
online platform, messaging application, or video streaming service that
connects to the internet and intentionally designs, markets, or promotes
features, content, or services with the primary purpose of attracting or
engaging individuals who are sixteen (16) years of age or younger.
(B) "Covered platform" does not include:
(i) An entity acting in the entity's own capacity as
a provider of:
(a) A common carrier service subject to the
Telecommunications Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-104;
(b) A broadband internet access service as
defined in 47 C.F.R. § 8.1(b), as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(c) An email service;
(d) A teleconferencing or videoconferencing
service that allows reception and transmission of audio and video signals for
real-time communication, provided that:
(1) It is not an online platform such as
a social media service or social network; and
(2) The real-time communication is
initiated by using a unique link or identifier to facilitate access; or
(e) A wireless messaging service, including a
service that is provided through short messaging service or multimedia
messaging service protocols:
(1) That is not a component of or linked
to an online platform; and
(2) Where the predominant or exclusive
function is direct messaging consisting of the transmission of text, photos,
or videos that are sent by electronic means, where messages are transmitted
from the sender to the recipient, and are not posted within an online
platform or publicly;
(ii) An organization that is not organized to carry
on business for its own profit or the profit of its members;
03-13-2025 09:54:56 LJH197

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 HB1726
(iii) A public or private preschool, elementary
school, secondary school, or any institution of vocational, professional, or
higher education, or any service provided on behalf of those institutions
that are subject to federal or state laws governing student privacy;
(iv) A library as defined in the Library Services
and Technology Act, 20 U.S.C. § 9121 et seq., as it existed on January 1,
2025;
(v) A news website or news application when:
(a) The inclusion of video content on the
website or application is related to the website or application's own
gathering, reporting, or publishing of news content; and
(b) The website or application is not
otherwise an online platform;
(vi) A product or service that primarily functions
as business-to-business software;
(vii) A virtual private network or similar service
that exists solely to route internet traffic between locations; or
(viii) An interactive gaming platform that complies
with the requirements of the Children's Online Privacy Protection Act, 15
U.S.C. § 6501 et seq., and the regulations, rules, guidance, and exemptions
under the Children's Online Privacy Protection Act, 15 U.S.C. § 6501 et seq.,
as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(5) "Deidentified" means data that does not identify and is not
linked or reasonably linkable to a device that is linked or reasonably
linkable to an individual, regardless of whether the information is
aggregated;
(6) "Geolocation" means information sufficient to identify a
street name and a name of a city or town;
(7)(A) "Individual-specific advertising to minors" means
advertising or any other effort to market a product or service that is
directed to a specific minor or a device that is linked or reasonably
linkable to a minor based on:
(i) The personal data of the minor or a group of
minors who are similar in sex, age, income level, race, or ethnicity to the
specific minor to whom the product or service is marketed;
(ii) Psychological profiling of a minor or group of
03-13-2025 09:54:56 LJH197

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 HB1726
minors; or
(iii) A unique identifier of the device.
(B) "Individual-specific advertising to minors" includes
advertising or any other effort to market a product or service that is
directed to a specific minor or a device that is linked or reasonably
linkable to a minor as a result of use by the minor, access by device of the
minor, or use by a group of minors who are similar to the specific minor of
more than a single:
(i) Website;
(ii) Online service;
(iii) Online application;
(iv) Mobile application; or
(v) Connected device.
(C) "Individual-specific advertising to minors" does not
include:
(i) Advertising or marketing to a minor or the
device of the minor's specific request for information or feedback, including
without limitation a minor's current search query;
(ii) Contextual advertising, including without
limitation when an advertisement is displayed based on the content of the
covered platform on which the advertisement appears and does not vary based
on personal information related to the minor; or
(iii) Processing personal information solely for
measuring or reporting advertising or content performance, reach, or
frequency, including without limitation independent measurement.
(D) Subdivision (7)(A) of this section does not prohibit a
covered platform that knows that an individual is a minor from delivering an
advertisement that is age-appropriate for the minor involved and intended for
a minor, so long as the covered platform does not use any personal data other
than whether the individual is a minor in deciding to deliver the
advertisement;
(8) "Knows" means to have actual knowledge or knowledge fairly
implied on the basis of objective circumstances;
(9) "Mental health disorder" means the same as "mental disorder"
under the most current edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of
Mental Disorders;
03-13-2025 09:54:56 LJH197

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 HB1726
(10) "Minor" means an individual who is sixteen (16) years of
age or younger;
(11) "Narcotic drugs" means the same as defined in the
Controlled Substances Act, 21 U.S.C. § 801 et seq., as it existed on January
1, 2025;
(12)(A) "Online platform" means any public-facing website,
online service, online application, or mobile application created primarily
to serve a community forum for user generated content, including without
limitation sharing videos, images, audio files, or other content.
(B) "Online platform" does not include:
(i) An entity that solely provides access to third-
party applications through a website, online service, online application, or
mobile application without exercising control over the functionality,
content, or user interactions within those applications;
(ii) A broadband internet service; or
(iii) A telecommunications service, as defined in 47
U.S.C. § 153, as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(13) "Parent" means:
(A) A natural parent of a minor;
(B) A legal guardian of a minor; or
(C) An individual with legal custody of a minor;
(14) "Personal data" means information that identifies or is
linked or reasonably linkable to a particular minor, including without
limitation a consumer device identifier that is linked or reasonably linkable
to a minor;
(15) "Personalized recommendation system" means a fully or
partially automated system used to suggest, promote, or rank content,
including other users or posts, based on the personal data of a user or
users;
(16) "Precise geolocation information" means geolocation
information that identifies an individual's location within a range of five
(5) miles or less;
(17) "Verifiable parental consent" means the same as defined in
the Children's Online Privacy Protection Act, 15 U.S.C. § 6501 et seq., as it
existed on January 1, 2025; and
(18) "Video streaming service" means a digital platform that
03-13-2025 09:54:56 LJH197

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 HB1726
enables users to upload, share, or view user-generated video content in real
time.

4-88-1503. Duty of care — Prevention of harm to minors — Limitations.
(a) A covered platform shall take reasonable measures in the design
and operation of any product, service, or feature that the covered platform
knows is used by minors to avoid any heightened risk of harm to minors caused
by such product, service, or feature, including without limitation:
(1) The following mental health disorders, consistent with
evidence-informed medical information:
(A) Anxiety;
(B) Depression;
(C) Eating disorders;
(D) Substance use disorders; and
(E) Suicidal behaviors;
(2) Patterns of use that indicate or encourage addiction-like
behaviors;
(3) Physical violence, online bullying, and harassment of the
minor;
(4) Sexual exploitation and abuse;
(5) Promotion and marketing of narcotic drugs, tobacco products,
gambling, or alcohol; and
(6) Predatory, unfair, or deceptive marketing practices and
other financial harms.
(b) This section does not require a covered platform to prevent or
preclude:
(1) A minor from deliberately and independently searching for or
specifically requesting content; or
(2) The covered platform or individuals on the covered platform
from providing resources for the prevention or mitigation of the harms
described in subsection (a) of this section.

4-88-1504. Safeguards for minors — Parental tools — Reporting —
Application.
(a) A covered platform shall provide an individual that the covered
platform knows is a minor with readily accessible and easy-to-use safeguards
03-13-2025 09:54:56 LJH197

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 HB1726
to:
(1) Limit the ability of other individuals to communicate with
the minor;
(2) Prevent other users, whether registered or not, from viewing
the minor's personal data collected by or shared on the covered platform,
including without limitation restricting public access to personal data;
(3) Limit features that are incorporated for the sole or primary
purpose of increasing, sustaining, or extending use of the covered platform
by the minor, including without limitation:
(A) Automatic playing of media;
(B) Rewards for time spent on the covered platform; and
(C) Other features that result in compulsive usage of the
covered platform by the minor;
(4) Control personalized recommendation systems by providing the
minor with the ability to:
(A) Opt out of personalized recommendation systems while
still allowing the display of content based on a chronological format; or
(B) Limit access to certain types or categories of
recommendations from the personalized recommendation systems;
(5) Restrict the sharing of the precise geolocation information
of the minor to other users on the covered platform; and
(6) Provide notice regarding the tracking of the minor's precise
geolocation information.
(b) A covered platform shall provide an individual that the covered
platform knows is a minor with readily accessible and easy-to-use options to:
(1) Delete the minor's account and any personal data collected
from or shared by the minor on the covered platform; and
(2) Limit the amount of time spent by the minor on the covered
platform.
(c) In the case of a user that the covered platform knows is a minor,
a covered platform shall provide that the default setting for any safeguard
described under subsection (a) of this section shall be the option available
on the covered platform that provides the most protective level of control
that is offered by the covered platform over privacy and safety for that
user.
(d)(1) A covered platform shall provide readily accessible and easy-
03-13-2025 09:54:56 LJH197

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 HB1726
to-use settings for a parent to support an individual that the covered
platform knows is a minor with respect to the individual's use of the covered
platform.
(2) The parental settings provided by a covered platform under
subdivision (d)(1) of this section shall include:
(A) The ability to manage a minor's privacy and account
settings, including without limitation the safeguards and options established
under subsections (a) and (b) of this section, in a manner that allows a
parent to:
(i) View the privacy and account settings; and
(ii) In the case of a user that the covered platform
knows is a child, change and control the privacy and account settings; and
(B) The ability to:
(i) Restrict purchases and financial transactions by
the minor; and
(ii) View metrics of total time spent on the covered
platform and restrict time spent on the covered platform by the minor.
(3) A covered platform shall provide clear and conspicuous
notice to an individual that the platform knows is a minor when the settings
under subdivisions (1)—(3) of this subsection (d) are in use and what
settings or controls have been applied.
(4) If a covered platform knows a user is a child, the covered
platform shall ensure that the settings described under subdivisions (d)(1)
and (d)(2) of this section are enabled by default.
(e)(1) A covered platform shall provide:
(A) A readily accessible and easy-to-use means to submit
reports to the covered platform of harms to a minor;
(B) An electronic point of contact specific to matters
involving harms to a minor; and
(C) Confirmation of the covered platform's receipt of such
a report and a means to track a submitted report through the covered
platform.
(2)(A) A covered platform shall establish an internal process to
receive and substantively respond to such reports in a reasonable and timely
manner, but in no case later than:
(i) Ten (10) days after receipt of a report, if for
03-13-2025 09:54:56 LJH197

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 HB1726
the most recent calendar year, the covered platform averaged more than ten
million (10,000,000) active users on a monthly basis in the United States; or
(ii) Twenty-one (21) days after receipt of a report,
if for the most recent calendar year, the covered platform averaged ten
million (10,000,000) or fewer active users on a monthly basis in the United
States.
(B) However, if the report under this subsection (e)
involves an imminent threat to the safety of a minor, a covered platform
shall address as promptly as possible the reported threat to safety.
(f) If a covered platform knows an individual is a minor, the covered
platform shall not facilitate advertising to the minor of:
(1) Narcotic drugs;
(2) Tobacco products;
(3) Gambling; or
(4) Alcohol.
(g) A covered platform shall implement the safeguards and parental
controls described under subsections (a)—(d) of this section by providing:
(1) Information and control options in a clear and conspicuous
manner that:
(A) Considers the differing ages, capacities, and
developmental needs of the minors most likely to access the covered platform;
and
(B) Does not encourage a minor or a parent of a minor to
weaken or disable safeguards or parental controls;
(2) Readily accessible and easy-to-use controls to enable or
disable safeguards or parental controls; and
(3) Information and control options in the same language, form,
and manner as the covered platform provides the product or service used by
minors and their parents.
(h) It is unlawful and a violation of the Deceptive Trade Practices
Act, § 4-88-101 et seq., for any covered platform to design, modify, or
manipulate a user interface of a covered platform with the purpose or
substantial effect of subverting or impairing user autonomy, decision-making,
or choice regarding safeguards or parental controls required under this
section.
(i) This section does not:
03-13-2025 09:54:56 LJH197

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 HB1726
(1) Prevent a covered platform from taking reasonable measures
to:
(A) Block, detect, or prevent the distribution of
unlawful, obscene, or other harms to minors as described in § 4-88-1503; or
(B) Block or filter spam, prevent criminal activity, or
protect the security of a covered platform;
(2) Require the disclosure of a minor's browsing behavior,
search history, messages, contact list, or other content or metadata of his
or her communications;
(3) Prevent a covered platform from using a personalized
recommendation system to display content to a minor if the personalized
recommendation system only uses information on:
(A) The language spoken by the minor;
(B) The city the minor is located in; or
(C) The minor's age;
(4) Prohibit a covered platform from integrating its products or
service with controls from third-party systems, including without limitation
operating systems or gaming consoles, to meet the requirements imposed under
subsections (a)—(d) of this section regarding safeguards for minors and
settings for parents, provided that:
(A) The controls meet the requirements under subsections
(a)—(d) of this section; and
(B) The minor or parent is provided with reasonable notice
under the circumstances of the integration and use of the controls; or
(5) Require a covered platform to weaken existing privacy and
security protections or prevent implementation of new privacy and security
protections of a platform or service, including without limitation privacy-
enhancing technologies.

4-88-1505. Disclosure — Notice — Personalized recommendation system —
Advertising and marketing information and labels — Resources.
(a)(1) Before registration or purchase of a covered platform by an
individual that the platform knows is a minor, the covered platform shall
provide clear, conspicuous, and easy-to-understand:
(A) Notice of the policies and practices of the covered
platform regarding personal data and safeguards for minors; and
03-13-2025 09:54:56 LJH197

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 HB1726
(B) Information about how to access the safeguards and
parental tools required under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section.
(2)(A) In the case of an individual that a covered platform
knows is a child, the platform shall provide information about the parental
settings and safeguards required under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section
to a parent of the child and obtain verifiable parental consent from the
parent before the initial use of the covered platform by the child.
(B) A covered platform is deemed to have satisfied the
requirement described in subdivision (a)(2)(A) if the covered platform uses
reasonable efforts taking into consideration available technology to provide
a parent with the information described in subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this
section and to obtain verifiable parental consent under § 4-88-1504.
(C) If the covered platform is not required to obtain
verifiable parental consent under § 4-88-1504, the covered platform shall
provide information about the parental tools and safeguards required under §
4-88-1504 to a parent of a user that the platform knows is a child and obtain
parental consent from the parent before the initial use of the covered
platform by the child.
(b) In a clear, conspicuous, and easy-to-understand manner, a covered
platform shall set out in its terms and conditions of use:
(1) An overview of how the personalized recommendation system is
used by the covered platform to provide information to the users of the
covered platform who are minors, including without limitation how the
personalized recommendation system uses the personal data of minors; and
(2) Information about options for a minor or his or her parent
to opt out of or control the personalized recommendation system.
(c) A covered platform that facilitates advertising aimed at a user
that the covered platform knows is a minor shall provide clear, conspicuous,
and easy-to-understand information and labels to the minor on advertisements
regarding:
(1) The name of the product, service, or brand and the subject
matter of an advertisement;
(2) If the covered platform engages in individual-specific
advertising to minors, why a particular advertisement is directed to a
specific minor, including without limitation material information about how
the minor's personal data is used to direct the advertisement to the minor;
03-13-2025 09:54:56 LJH197

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 HB1726
and
(3) Whether particular media displayed to the minor is an
advertisement or marketing material, including without limitation disclosure
of endorsements of products, services, or brands made for commercial
consideration by other users of the covered platform.
(d) A covered platform shall provide to a minor and his or her parent
clear, conspicuous, easy-to-understand, and comprehensive information in a
prominent location regarding:
(1) The covered platform's policies and practices regarding
collection and retention of personal data and safeguards in place to protect
minors; and
(2) How to access the parental settings and tools required under
§ 4-88-1504.
(e) To the extent practicable, a covered platform shall ensure that
the disclosures required by this section are made available in the same
language, form, and manner as the covered platform provides any product or
service used by a minor and his or her parent.

4-88-1506. Enforcement.
(a) In an enforcement action brought under this subchapter, the
Attorney General shall allege a violation of a specific provision or specific
provisions of this subchapter.
(b)(1) A violation of this subchapter is:
(A) An unfair and deceptive act or practice under the
Deceptive Trade Practices Act, § 4-88-101 et seq.; and
(B) Punishable solely by action of the Attorney General.
(2) All remedies, penalties, and authority granted to the
Attorney General under the Deceptive Trade Practices Act, § 4-88-101 et seq.,
shall be available to the Attorney General for the enforcement of this
subchapter.
(3) The remedies and penalties for violations under this
subchapter are cumulative and in addition to other procedures or remedies for
violations or conduct under other law.
(c) Before initiating an enforcement action against a covered platform
for an alleged violation of this subchapter, the Attorney General shall first
provide written notice to the covered platform that is alleged to have
03-13-2025 09:54:56 LJH197

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 HB1726
committed or to be committing one (1) or more of the violations of this
subchapter.
(d) If, to the extent reasonably practicable, the covered platform
cures the alleged violation of this subchapter within ninety (90) days of
receiving the notice specified in subsection (c) of this section, then the
Attorney General shall not pursue further enforcement action for those
alleged violations of this subchapter.

4-88-1507. Kids Online Safety Council — Creation.
(a) There is created within the Department of Commerce a council to be
known as the "Kids Online Safety Council".
(b) The council shall consist of nine (9) members appointed by the
Secretary of the Department of Commerce and include diverse participation
from:
(1) Academic experts, health professionals, and members of civil
society with expertise in mental health, substance use disorders, and the
prevention of harms to minors;
(2) Representatives in academia and civil society with specific
expertise in privacy and civil liberties;
(3) Parents and youth representation;
(4) Representatives of covered platforms;
(5) Representatives of the State Securities Department, the
Department of Corrections, the Department of Health, and the Department of
Human Services;
(6) Educators; and
(7) Representatives of communities of socially disadvantaged
individuals as defined in the Small Business Act, 15 U.S.C. § 631 et seq., as
it existed on January 1, 2025.
(c) The council shall:
(1) Identify emerging or current risks of harms to minors
associated with online platforms;
(2) Recommend measures and methods for assessing, preventing,
and mitigating harms to minors online;
(3) Recommend methods and themes for conducting research
regarding online harms to minors, including in English and languages other
than English; and
03-13-2025 09:54:56 LJH197

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 HB1726
(4) Recommend best practices and clear, consensus-based
technical standards for transparency reports and audits, as required under
this subchapter, including methods, criteria, and scope to promote overall
accountability.

4-88-1508. Filter bubble transparency requirements — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Algorithmic ranking system” means a computational process,
including without limitation a computational process derived from algorithmic
decision-making, machine learning, statistical analysis, or other data
processing or artificial intelligence techniques, used to determine the
selection, order, relative prioritization, or relative prominence of content
from a set of information that is provided to a user on a covered platform,
including without limitation:
(A) The ranking of search results;
(B) The provision of content recommendations;
(C) The display of social media posts; or
(D) Any other method of automated content selection;
(2) "Downstream provider” means, with respect to a search
syndication contract, the person that receives access to an index of web
pages on the internet from an upstream provider under such contract;
(3)(A) "Input-transparent algorithm” means an algorithmic
ranking system that does not use the user-specific data of a user to
determine the selection, order, relative prioritization, or relative
prominence of information that is furnished to such user on a covered
platform, unless the user-specific data is expressly provided to the covered
platform by the user for that purpose.
(B) For purposes of subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this section,
user-specific data that is provided by a user for the express purpose of
determining the selection, order, relative prioritization, or relative
prominence of information that is furnished to such user on a covered
platform:
(i) Shall include user-supplied search terms,
filters, speech patterns if provided for the purpose of enabling the covered
platform to accept spoken input or select the language in which the user
interacts with the covered platform, saved preferences, and the current
03-13-2025 09:54:56 LJH197

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 HB1726
precise geolocation information that is supplied by the user;
(ii) Shall include the user's current approximate
geolocation information;
(iii) Shall include data affirmatively supplied to
the covered platform by the user that expresses the user's desire to receive
particular information, such as the social media profiles the user follows,
the video channels the user subscribes to, or other content or sources of
content on the platform the user selects;
(iv) Shall not include the history of the user's
connected device, including the user's history of web searches and browsing,
previous geographical locations, physical activity, device interaction, and
financial transactions; and
(v) Shall not include inferences about the user or
the user's connected device, without regard to whether such inferences are
based on data described in subdivision (a)(3)(B)(i) or subdivision
(a)(3)(B)(ii) of this section;
(4)(A) "Opaque algorithm” means an algorithmic ranking system
that determines the selection, order, relative prioritization, or relative
prominence of information that is furnished to the user on a covered platform
based, in whole or part, on user-specific data that was not expressly
provided by the user to the platform for such purpose.
(B) "Opaque algorithm" does not include an algorithmic
ranking system used by a covered platform if:
(i) The only user-specific data, including without
limitation inferences about the user, that algorithmic ranking system uses is
information relating to the age of the user; and
(ii) The information is only used to restrict a
user's access to content on the basis that the individual is a minor;
(5) "Search syndication contract” means a contract or
subcontract for the sale of, license of, or other right to access an index of
web pages or search results on the internet for the purpose of operating an
internet search engine;
(6) "Upstream provider” means, with respect to a search
syndication contract, the person that grants access to an index of web pages
or search results on the internet to a downstream provider under the
contract; and
03-13-2025 09:54:56 LJH197

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 HB1726
(7) "User-specific data” means information relating to an
individual or a specific connected device that would not necessarily be true
of every individual or device.
(b)(1) It is unlawful:
(A) For any person to operate a covered platform that uses
an opaque algorithm unless the person complies with the requirements of
subdivision (b)(2) of this section; or
(B) For any upstream provider to grant access to an index
of web pages on the internet under a search syndication contract that does
not comply with the requirements of subdivision (b)(3) of this section.
(2)(A) A covered platform operating an opaque algorithm shall:
(i) Provide notice to users of the covered platform:
(a) That the covered platform uses an opaque
algorithm that uses user-specific data to select the content the user sees,
with such notice presented in a clear, conspicuous manner on the covered
platform whenever the user interacts with an opaque algorithm for the first
time that can be dismissed by the user; and
(b) In the terms and conditions of the covered
platform, in a clear, accessible, and easily comprehensible manner to be
updated no less frequently than one (1) time every six (6) months:
(1) The most salient features, inputs,
and parameters used by the opaque algorithm;
(2) How any user-specific data used by
the algorithm is collected or inferred about a user of the covered platform,
and the categories of such data;
(3) Any options that the covered
internet platform makes available for a user of the covered platform to opt
out or exercise options under subdivision (b)(2)(A)(ii) of this section,
modify the profile of the user, or influence the features, inputs, or
parameters used by the opaque algorithm; and
(4) Any quantities, such as time spent
using a product or specific measures of engagement or social interaction,
that the opaque algorithm is designed to optimize, as well as a general
description of the relative importance of each quantity for such ranking; and
(ii) Make available a version of the covered
platform that uses an input-transparent algorithm and enables users to easily
03-13-2025 09:54:56 LJH197

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 HB1726
switch between the version of the platform that uses an opaque algorithm and
the version of the covered platform that uses the input-transparent
algorithm.
(B) Subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section shall not apply
to an internet search engine if:
(i) The internet search engine is operated by a
downstream provider with fewer than one thousand (1,000) employees; and
(ii) The internet search engine uses an index of web
pages on the internet to which the downstream provider received access under
a search syndication contract.
(3) An upstream provider engaged in a search syndication
contract shall:
(A) Make available to the downstream provider the same
input-transparent algorithm used by the upstream provider for purposes of
complying with subdivision (b)(2)(A)(ii) of this section; and
(B) Not impose any additional costs, degraded quality,
reduced speed, or other constraint on the functioning of the input-
transparent algorithm when used by the downstream provider to operate an
internet search engine relative to the performance of the input-transparent
algorithm when used by the upstream provider to operate an internet search
engine.
(4) A covered platform shall not deny, charge different prices
or rates for, or condition the provision of a service or product to an
individual based on the individual’s election to use a version of the
platform that uses an input-transparent algorithm as provided under
subdivision (b)(2)(A)(ii) of this section.
(c) This section does not limit or prohibit a covered platform’s
ability to, at the direction of an individual user or group of users,
restrict another user from searching for, finding, accessing, or interacting
with a user’s or group’s account, content, data, or online community.

4-88-1509. Construction.
(a) For purposes of enforcing this subchapter, in making a
determination of whether a covered platform has knowledge fairly implied on
the basis of objective circumstances that a user is a minor, the Attorney
General shall rely on competent and reliable empirical evidence, taking into
03-13-2025 09:54:56 LJH197

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 HB1726
account the totality of the circumstances, including without limitation
consideration of whether the operator, using available technology, exercised
reasonable care.
(b) This subchapter does not require:
(1) The collection of any personal data that a covered platform
is not already collecting in the normal course of business;
(2) A covered platform to implement an age gating or age
verification functionality;
(3) The disclosure of information that may impact the privacy of
users or the security of a covered platform's service;
(4) A covered platform to weaken existing privacy and security
protections or prevent implementation of new privacy and security protections
of a platform or service, including without limitation privacy-enhancing
technologies; or
(5) A covered platform to perform an action that is not
technically feasible.
(c) This subchapter does not restrict a covered platform's ability to:
(1) Cooperate with law enforcement agencies regarding activity
that the covered platform reasonably and in good faith believes may violate
federal law, state law, or local regulations;
(2) Comply with a civil, criminal, or regulatory inquiry or any
investigation, subpoena, or summons by federal, state, local, or other
government authorities; or
(3) Investigate, establish, exercise, respond to, or defend
against legal claims.
(d) A video streaming service is in compliance with this subchapter
if:
(1) It predominantly consists of news, sports, entertainment, or
other video programming content that is preselected by the provider and not
user-generated;
(2) Any chat, comment, or interactive functionality that the
video streaming service provides is incidental to, directly related to, or
dependent on provision of that content; and
(3) If the video streaming service requires account owner
registration and is not predominantly news or sports, the video streaming
service includes the capability:
03-13-2025 09:54:56 LJH197

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 HB1726
(A) To limit a minor’s access to the video streaming
service, including without limitation utilizing a system of age-rating;
(B) To limit the automatic playing of on-demand content
selected by a personalized recommendation system for an individual that the
video streaming service knows is a minor;
(C) To provide an individual that the video streaming
service knows is a minor with readily accessible and easy-to-use options to
delete an account held by the minor and delete any personal data collected
from the minor on the service, or, in the case of a video streaming service
that allows a parent to create a profile for a minor, to allow a parent to
delete the minor’s profile, and to delete any personal data collected from
the minor on the video streaming service;
(D) For a parent to manage a minor’s privacy and account
settings, and restrict purchases and financial transactions by a minor;
(E) To provide an electronic point of contact specific to
matters described in subdivision (d)(3) of this section;
(F) To offer a clear, conspicuous, and easy-to-understand
notice of the policies and practices with respect to personal data and the
capabilities described in this subdivision (d)(3); and
(G) When providing on-demand content, to employ measures
that safeguard against serving advertising for narcotic drugs, tobacco
products, gambling, or alcohol directly to the account or profile of an
individual that the video streaming service knows is a minor.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. EFFECTIVE DATE.
This act is effective on and after July 1, 2026.

/s/Gramlich








03-13-2025 09:54:56 LJH197